Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.102

Director—Contract for collection and tabulation of census block statistics.

Subject to a specific appropriation for that purpose, the director of financial management is hereby authorized and directed to contract with the United States bureau of census for collection and tabulation of block statistics in any or all cities and towns.

[ 1979 c 151 s 115; 1977 ex.s. c 128 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 128: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.